Missouri, session 2026, SB1645.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 144, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 144.052, to read as
follows:
144.052. 1. As used in this section, the term
"campground" shall mean any parcel or tract of land,
including buildings and other structures, where five or more
campsites are made available for use as temporary living
quarters for recreational, camping, travel, or seasonal
use. The term "campground" shall also include recreational
vehicle parks.
2. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in
addition to all other exemptions granted under this chapter,
there is hereby specifically exempted from the provisions of
sections 144.010 to 144.525 and sections 144.600 to 144.761
and the local sales tax law as defined in section 32.085 and
from the computation of the tax levied, assessed, or payable
under sections 144.010 to 144.525 and sections 144.600 to
144.761 and the local sales tax law as defined in section
32.085, fees or charges for rental of lots, buildings, other
structures, and amenities in a campground. The provisions

SB 1645 2
of this section shall be in addition to any other sales or
use tax exemptions provided by law.
✓